District of Columbia statutes.
7-1831.05

Severability.

If a provision of this subchapter or its application to a person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this subchapter which can be given effect without the invalid provisions or application.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 3706, 47 DCR 6308

History

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see notes following § 7-1831.01.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 3702 to 3707 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).

Emergency Legislation